Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-552
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Intergovernmental Data Services Program Act, the definitions found in sections 86-554 to 86-561 apply.

Laws 1993, LB 543, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 32;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1120.36;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 322;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 12.